Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2178.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change The article heading of title 41, chapter 57, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "VACCINATION STATUS" to "STATE AGENCIES generally". Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 57, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-5902, to read: START_STATUTE41-5902. Chief medical officer; medical license Notwithstanding any other law, any person who is serving as the chief medical officer for a state agency must possess an active license to practice medicine in this state pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.